Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4107.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 239.7511, is amended to read: 239.7511 GAS TAX SIGN ON PETROLEUM DISPENSER. (a) The director must ensure that signs having 12-point font or greater are affixed on retail petroleum dispensers as follows: (1) for regular or premium gasoline, a sign that reads: "The price for each gallon of gasoline includes the current state gasoline tax of 28.5 cents per gallon and federal gasoline tax of 18.4 cents per gallon. Revenue from the state fuel tax may be used only for roads and bridges, according to the Minnesota Constitution."; and (2) for new text begin on-road new text end diesel fuel, a sign that reads: "The price for each gallon of diesel fuel includes the current state gasoline tax of 28.5 cents per gallon and federal gasoline tax of 24.4 cents per gallon. Revenue from the state fuel tax may be used only for roads and bridges, according to the Minnesota Constitution." deleted text begin (b) The director must distribute the signs under this section to the owner or operator of retail petroleum dispensers. To the extent possible, the director must coordinate the distribution of signs with other duties the director may have involving retail petroleum dispensers. deleted text end deleted text begin (c) If the amount of the gasoline tax described in paragraph (a), clauses (1) and (2), changes, the director must distribute revised signs to reflect the updated gasoline tax amounts within 12 calendar months of the change. deleted text end deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (b)new text end The director is prohibited from assessing any penalty, fine, or fee on the owner or operator of a retail petroleum dispenser that has a missing, destroyed, defaced, or otherwise damaged gas tax sign. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 239.761, subdivision 4b, is amended to read: Subd. 4b. Gasoline blended with ethanol; alternative fuel vehicles. (a) Gasoline blended for use in an alternative fuel vehicle, as defined in section 296A.01, subdivision 5, may contain any percentage of agriculturally derived, denatured ethanol, by volume, not to exceed 85 percent. The gasoline-ethanol blend must comply with the general provisions in subdivision 4. The gasoline and ethanol may be blended by an ethanol blender or at the point of retail sale in an ethanol-blending fuel dispenser deleted text begin clearly labeled "FLEX-FUEL VEHICLES ONLY."deleted text end new text begin .new text end If blended by an ethanol blender, the percentage of ethanol in the resulting gasoline-ethanol blend must be clearly identified. (b) If a person responsible for the product utilizes an ethanol-blending fuel dispenser to dispense both gasoline blended with ethanol for use in alternative fuel vehicles and gasoline blended with ethanol for use in standard combustion engines, the person must ensure that the gasoline blended with ethanol for use in standard combustion engines is dispensed from a fuel-dispensing hose and nozzle or other conveyance dedicated solely to gasoline blended with ethanol for use in standard combustion engines and clearly labeled as such. (c) A person responsible for the product who complies with the provisions in paragraph (b) is not responsible for a self-service fueling action taken by that person's retail fuel customer.